Wisconsin, session 2025, AB898.
do enact as follows:AB898,13Section 1. 69.14 (1) (h) of the statutes is renumbered 69.14 (1) (h) 1. and 4amended to read:AB898,2,10169.14 (1) (h) 1. If the registrant of a birth record under this section is born to 2a surrogate mother, information about the surrogate mother shall be entered on the 3birth record and the information about the father shall be omitted from the birth 4record. If Subject to subd. 2., if a court determines parental rights over the 5registrant, the clerk of court shall report the court’s determination to the state 6registrar on a form prescribed by the state registrar, along with the fee required 7under s. 69.22. Upon receipt of the report, the state registrar shall prepare and 8register a new birth record for the registrant under s. 69.15 (6) and send notice of 9the new record to the local registrar who filed the original record. Upon receipt of 10the notice, the local registrar shall destroy his or her copy of the replaced record.AB898,211Section 2. 69.14 (1) (h) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB898,2,141269.14 (1) (h) 2. A court may not determine parental rights over a registrant 13under subd. 1., except through an adoption proceeding, unless at least one 14individual petitioning for paternal rights is biologically related to the registrant.AB898,2,1515